Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 3

Powers of Registered Companies

45-5-301. General powers of registrants.

Any registrant under this chapter has the power to:

Lend money, with or without security, and to take as security real or personal property, or both;

Charge interest:

On loans where the amount financed is less than one hundred dollars ($100), at a nominal rate not in excess of seven and one-half percent (7.5%) per annum, deducted in advance, on the principal for the full term thereof without regard to the payment schedule; but no interest shall be charged on the loans in excess of a maximum effective rate of eighteen percent (18%) per annum;

On loans where the amount financed is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), on the principal at any rate not in excess of a maximum effective rate of thirty percent (30%) per annum;

On loans where the amount financed is more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), on the principal at any rate not in excess of the maximum effective rate of twenty-four percent (24%) per annum; and

On loans made under open-end credit plans, which are plans under which a registrant contemplates repeated loans that may be without fixed maturities or limitation as to the length of term, and that are subject to prepayment at any time, at any rate not in excess of a maximum effective rate of twenty-four percent (24%) per annum;

All the interest shall be contracted for and computed in accordance with § 45-5-401;

Charge loan charges, but subject to the limitations provided in § 45-5-403; provided, that no loan charge shall be imposed unless a loan is made or an open-end credit plan is established or renewed for a term of not less than three (3) years;

Require, at the expense of the borrower, insurance against the hazards to which any collateral used to secure the loan is subject; and upon the failure of the borrower to supply the same to procure the same, subject to § 45-5-305;

Accept, but not require, as additional collateral at the expense of the borrower or borrowers, insurance against the hazards of death, or disability, or involuntary unemployment, or any combination thereof, of the borrower or borrowers, subject to § 45-5-305;

Engage in the purchase, discount and rediscount of notes, security agreements or security interests or other indicia of security originating from the sale or purchase of property or services;

Make loans to dealers in motor vehicles, appliances and other chattels for the purpose of acquiring, stocking and offering for sale the merchandise and to take appropriate security therefor;

Purchase or otherwise acquire and sell and negotiate drafts and acceptances drawn in connection with the sale of personal property on account of the purchase price thereof and take from the acceptors or holders of the drafts and acceptances as security for the drafts and acceptances, with or without other collateral, choses in action or other evidences of indebtedness issued by it and to be paid in uniform monthly, weekly or other periodical installments;

If an industrial investment company, not insured by an agency of the United States government, issue investment certificates subject to this chapter;

If an industrial bank, insured by an agency of the United States government, issue thrift certificates subject to this chapter;

Have any and all powers not specifically defined in this chapter that are granted by the laws of this state to corporations generally, except powers that are inconsistent with this chapter; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the power of registrants to make loans, charge interest and other charges consistent with the powers of corporations generally and subject to the limitations provided by title 47, chapters 14 and 15;

Subject to § 45-5-305(b), accept or sell, but not require, at the expense of the borrower or borrowers, one (1) or more credit-related insurance products;

As used in subdivision (12)(A) and § 45-5-305(b), “credit-related insurance products” is limited to individual term life or individual accidental death and dismemberment insurance sold by a registrant where the:

Beneficiary named by the debtor is a person other than the creditor;

Insurance is purchased by the debtor and financed as part of the credit transaction; and

Premium for the insurance is included in the principal of the loan; and

Make any change among the president, chief executive officer, treasurer, or chief financial officer, or among the general partner or partners; provided that the registrant gives written notice to the commissioner within fourteen (14) days of the change and furnishes other information that the commissioner may require.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 8; T.C.A., § 45-2008; Acts 1983, ch. 164, § 1; 1983, ch. 274, § 15; 1985, ch. 107, § 5; 1987, ch. 124, § 1; 1991, ch. 87, § 1; 1993, ch. 100, § 1; 1999, ch. 172, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, § 7; 2017, ch. 164, § 1; 2018, ch. 600, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Acts 2018, ch. 600, § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to loans made on or after March 23, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Loan charges under the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act. OAG 14-82, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (9/12/14).

45-5-302. General limitations on registrants.

No registrant under this chapter has the power to:

Receive deposits of money subject to check, payable on demand, or payable unconditionally at a fixed time; or to use the word “bank” or “banking,” “trust company” or other term commonly used to describe a banking corporation in its name; or to accept trusts or act as administrator, executor, testamentary or judicial trustee in any form;

Make any loan for an original principal sum of three hundred dollars ($300) or less for a term in excess of twenty-four (24) months, or make any loan for an original principal sum of more than three hundred dollars ($300) but less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a term in excess of thirty-six (36) months, but the term of any other loan shall be as the parties may contract, but not for a term in excess of one hundred eighty-one (181) months with respect to any loan subject to the limitations provided in this chapter as to interest and loan charges;

Make any loan to one (1) person, firm or corporation for more than ten percent (10%) of the amount of the stated capital and surplus of the registrant, except that this limitation shall not apply to loans made pursuant to § 45-5-301(7); nor shall this limitation apply to a registrant that does not issue, sell and have outstanding investment or thrift certificates;

Require the purchase of its investment or thrift certificates by a borrower simultaneously with a loan transaction;

Deposit any of its funds with any other corporation unless the corporation has been designated as the depository by a vote of the majority of the directors, exclusive of any director who is an officer, director or trustee of the depository so designated, present at a meeting duly called at which a quorum is in attendance; provided, that this subdivision (5) shall not apply to proprietorships or partnerships;

Move an office until five (5) days' notice of the registrant's intention to move has been given to the commissioner, who shall endorse the new address on the certificate of registration;

Take an instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after the loan is made;

Accept or procure willfully and knowingly a false financial statement from a borrower;

Use any unreasonable collection tactics, which include, but are not limited to, any conduct by the registrant or any employee or agent of the registrant that:

Causes the borrower or any member of the borrower's family to suffer bodily injury or physical harm;

Constitutes a willful or intentional trespass by force of the borrower's home or the borrower's personal property therein, without process of law;

Holds up the borrower to public ridicule or unreasonably degrades the borrower in the presence of the borrower's neighbors or business associates;

Uses, distributes, employs or mails any document, paper or instrument purporting to be a summons, warrant, notice or other process, or copy thereof, issued by a court or other public authority; or

Although otherwise lawful, occurs at an unreasonable hour of the night. Attempts to make collections by means of personal visits, telephone calls and the like shall be deemed to occur at an unreasonable hour of the night if they occur between the hours of ten o'clock p.m. (10:00 p.m.) and five o'clock a.m. (5:00 a.m.);

Publish or distribute or cause to be published or distributed any false or misleading advertising; or

Use multiple agreements, including those with affiliated lenders, with the intent to obtain a higher effective rate of interest or greater charges than would otherwise be authorized by this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 13; T.C.A., § 45-2013; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 16; 1986, ch. 576, § 1; 1991, ch. 87, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

45-5-303. Names used by registrants — Rules governing advertisements.

Every registrant under this chapter may use the words “industrial loan and thrift company” or any part of those words in its corporate name. It is unlawful for any registrant organized after July 1, 1968, and qualified under this chapter, to use as a part of its company name the words “savings and loan.” Each company organized prior to July 1, 1968, and using such words as part of its corporate name, as a condition precedent to its registration or reregistration under this chapter, shall agree to include with each use of its corporate name in advertising the issuance and sale of certificates of investment, in lettering at least two-thirds (2/3) the size of the lettering in its name and directly beneath its name so as to be plainly visible, the following addendum: “not federally insured.”

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deny the use or alteration of any name of any company registered under the former Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act on July 1, 1979.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to adopt rules governing the advertisements of registrants under this chapter in order to prevent confusion as to the different categories of registrants under this chapter and between the registrants and other financial institutions.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 14; T.C.A., § 45-2014; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 17; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

For information concerning the former Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-5-304. Investment certificates.

A registrant shall not issue investment certificates until:

The registrant has qualified as an industrial investment company and furnishes evidence to the commissioner that it meets the capital requirements specified in § 45-5-603;

The registrant gives notice to the commissioner that the registrant intends to issue investment certificates, which notice shall specify the number and total dollar amount of certificates to be offered and the terms of the offering;

The registrant files the forms, documents, and receipts to be used by the registrant with the commissioner; and

The registrant furnishes proof that the offering and sale of the investment certificates is covered by an effective registration under the Tennessee Securities Act, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, or that the securities division of the department of commerce and insurance has reviewed the proposed offering and determined that it is exempt from registration.

A registrant may use the forms, documents and receipts that have been filed with the commissioner until the commissioner gives the registrant notice that they do not meet the requirements of this chapter or that the registrant has not complied with other applicable laws.

Each investment certificate shall have printed thereon in at least ten-point bold-face type the following: “not federally insured.”

Except with the prior written approval of the commissioner, a registrant shall use the proceeds from the issuance and sale of investment certificates only in the conduct of its business.

A registrant shall not use the terms “banking hours,” “banking room,” or other similar banking terms in connection with advertising the issuance and sale of investment certificates. Each piece of the advertisement shall bear the full name of the registrant.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 15; T.C.A., § 45-2015; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-305. Insurance.

With respect to all insurance offered, sold or procured pursuant to the powers given registrants under § 45-5-301(4) and (5):

The insurance shall be written by an agent and with a company authorized to do business in Tennessee, or under a group policy issued by a company authorized to do business in Tennessee, at rates approved by the commissioner of commerce and insurance;

The borrower has the right to furnish the insurance through any agent or company the borrower desires, if the insurance company is in good standing with the department; or the borrower may authorize the registrant to obtain the insurance for the borrower, and when so authorized by written request, which writing shall be preserved by the company during the term of the loan and for a period of at least two (2) years thereafter, the registrant may have the insurance written by an agent who is an employee, servant, or agent of the registrant, or the insurance may be effected under a group policy issued to the registrant. Any gain or advantage to a registrant or any employee, officer, director, agent, affiliate or associate of the registrant from the insurance or its sale shall not be considered as additional or further charge or interest in connection with any loan made under this chapter; and

The amount and type of insurance that may be required or accepted shall bear a reasonable relation to the existing hazard and risk of loss and shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:

Life insurance shall be in an amount that does not exceed the total amount of the loan and shall be for a period that does not exceed the term of the loan;

Insurance against the hazard of disability of the borrower shall provide equal benefits, the total of all of which shall not exceed the total amount of the loan and shall not be payable beyond the maturity of the loan. The required time of continuous and total disability of the borrower before the beginning of the payment of benefits under the terms of the policy shall be at least seven (7) days, after which time benefits may accrue from then forward or may be retroactive to the first day of disability. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(3)(B) shall be construed to prevent the issuance of insurance requiring more than seven (7) days waiting period;

Property insurance on collateral required pursuant to § 45-5-301(4) shall include only coverage that bears a reasonable relationship to the existing hazards or risk of loss in an amount not in excess of the total amount of the loan or for a term not longer than the term of the loan. If a minimum dollar premium is charged or retained, the total amount so charged to or retained from a borrower or spouse or both by a lender and affiliated lenders in any one (1) year shall not exceed the minimum dollar premium approved by the commissioner of financial institutions for that type of insurance. Neither shall the insurance be required during a period of time when there is adequate property insurance in force that was written in connection with any loan made by the same registrant or an affiliated lender to the same borrower or spouse, or both;

Insurance against the hazard of involuntary unemployment shall provide for a specified number of monthly benefit payments during a specified term of coverage expressed in number of months; provided, that the term of coverage shall not exceed sixty (60) months, and the number of monthly benefit payments shall be at least one-third (1/3) the number of months in the term of coverage;

A registrant that obtains a group policy for the purpose of perfecting any insurance that may be required or accepted hereunder, or that obtains any life, disability, property, or involuntary unemployment insurance described in subdivisions (a)(3)(A)-(D), at the request of the borrower, shall contract with the insurance company for a provision in the policy that the coverage effected as to each individual insured debtor or borrower shall terminate automatically on prepayment in full of the loan by refinancing, renewal or otherwise, and the unearned premium shall be refunded to the registrant. The registrant shall pay or credit the unearned premium refund to the borrower. Only one (1) policy or group certificate of each of these types of insurance shall be accepted as collateral on any one (1) loan, except in the case of joint life insurance, and except in the case of joint disability insurance;

At the time the loan is made, the lender shall give to the borrower:

An insurance policy, a binder, or a certificate of insurance; or

A memorandum showing the name of the insurance company, the types of insurance issued, a description of the coverages, the date of the policy, which shall be the date on which the loan is made, the premium charge for each type of insurance, and if issued under a group policy, the number of the master policy;

If the premiums for insurance are paid from the proceeds of the loan, the amount so paid shall not exceed the premiums charged by the insurer for the insurance; and

In addition to this chapter, registrants shall have the power to accept or sell credit life and credit health and accident insurance pursuant to and in accordance with title 56, chapter 7, part 9.

The acceptance or sale of credit-related insurance products by registrants shall be subject to the following provisions:

The maximum term life insurance coverage and the maximum accidental death or dismemberment coverage available to one insured through a registrant shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each coverage, and the maximum term for each credit-related life insurance product shall not exceed sixty (60) months;

The registrant shall provide to each prospective insured a separate disclosure statement, signed by both the borrower or borrowers and the registrant's agent indicating the following:

The borrower's or borrowers' desire or desires to purchase the insurance as described in the disclosure statement;

The borrower or borrowers fully understand that buying the insurance is not a condition of the loan. The disclosure shall be made in bold face print appearing in the disclosure statement. In addition, notice of the disclosure shall be posted at any physical location where customers are served;

The owner of the policy may cancel the policy within thirty (30) days after the policy is issued and receive a full refund of the premium paid, by returning the policy to the insurer or upon written instructions to the insurer from the policy owner;

The owner of the policy may also cancel the policy more than thirty (30) days after the policy has been issued by giving notice of cancellation to the insurer, and on cancellation, the owner of the policy shall receive a portion of the premium paid in accordance with the terms of the policy; and

A statement with three (3) representative examples of the purchase of insurance under this section indicating the total amount of interest payable for each example of a loan and the amount of interest of the loan attributable to the insurance purchased under this section; and

Credit-related insurance products shall be treated as credit life insurance or credit accident and health insurance only as those terms are used in title 56, chapter 6, part 2 and title 56, chapter 8, part 1; credit-related insurance products shall not be treated as credit life insurance, credit accident and health insurance or credit disability insurance as those terms are otherwise used in title 56; provided, that this subsection (b) shall not affect any other provision of title 56, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 12; T.C.A., § 45-2012; Acts 1985, ch. 107, § 5; 1993, ch. 100, § 2; 1994, ch. 588, § 1; 1999, ch. 172, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.